Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-11] Temporarily determining the
United States dollar value of foreign-money claims for limited purposes.
(a) For the limited purpose of facilitating the enforcement of provisional
remedies in an action, (1) the value in United States dollars of assets to be
seized or restrained pursuant to a writ of attachment, garnishment, execution,
or other legal process, (2) the amount of United States dollars at issue for
assessing costs, or (3) the amount of United States dollars involved for a
surety bond or other court-required undertaking shall be ascertained as
provided in subsections (b) and (c).

(b) The party seeking the process, costs,
bond, or other undertaking must compute the dollar amount of the foreign money
claimed from a bank-offered spot rate of exchange prevailing at or near the
close of business on the banking day next preceding the filing of a request or
application for the issuance of process or for the determination of costs, or
an application for a bond or other court-required undertaking.

(c) The party seeking the process, costs,
bond, or other undertaking shall file with each request or application an
affidavit or certificate executed in good faith by its counsel or a bank
officer, stating the market quotation used, how obtained, and setting forth the
calculation. Affected court officials incur no liability, after a filing of
the affidavit or certificate, for acting as if the judgment was in the amount
of United States dollars stated in the affidavit or certificate.

(d) Computations under this section are for
the limited purposes of the section and do not affect computation of the United
States dollar equivalent of the money of the judgment for payment purposes. [L
1990, c 50, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next